Tennessee, session 114, HB0085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1021(a), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(a) In accordance with § 49-6-1022, each LEA shall integrate:
(1) For elementary school students, a minimum of sixty (60) minutes of
physical activity per full school day; and
(2) For middle and high school students, a minimum of ninety (90)
minutes of physical activity per full school week.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1021(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b)
(1) Physical activity may include walking, jumping rope, playing
volleyball, or other forms of physical activity that promote fitness and well-being.
Walking to and from class is not physical activity for purposes of this section.
(2) To satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a)(1):
(A) Physical activity:
(i) Must include unstructured play outside, unless weather
conditions negatively impact reasonable execution of physical
activity outside; and
(ii) Does not include:
HB0085
000694
- 1 -

(a) Time during which a student is permitted to use
an electronic device; or
(b) Time spent by a student in a physical education
class;
(B) An LEA shall offer elementary students two (2) thirty-minute
periods of physical activity per school day, one (1) session occurring in
the morning and one (1) session occurring in the afternoon; and
(C) A student shall not be withheld from participating in physical
activity as a form of punishment.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000694